apertium-sco.sco.dix
<pardef n="chib__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bit</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bit</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bin</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bin</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bin</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="clear__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cless__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="leuk__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="airm__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="advis/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="annoonc/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bauch/le__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elt</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elt</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lin</l>       <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bok/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bus/y__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>         <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>it</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>        <r>y<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="chor/ie__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>          <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>         <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yin</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="dinnle">            <i>dinn</i><par n="bauch/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="absteen">          <i>absteen</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="abuise">           <i>abuis</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="act">              <i>act</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="admeet">           <i>admeet</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="advise">           <i>advise</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="annoonce">         <i>annoonc</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="annoonce">         <i>annoonc</i><par n="annoonc/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="annunce">          <i>annunc</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="appone">           <i>appone</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="assoilyie">        <i>assoilyi</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="attempt">          <i>attempt</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bauchle">          <i>bauchle</i><par n="bauch/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bield">            <i>boak</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="boke">             <i>bok</i><par n="bok/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="borry">            <i>borr</i><par n="bus/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bowk">             <i>bowk</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="breinge">          <i>breinge</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="buird">            <i>buird</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bumbaise">         <i>bumbaise</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="busk">             <i>busk</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="busy">             <i>busy</i><par n="bus/y__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cairt">            <i>cairt</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chant">            <i>chant</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cheep">            <i>cheep</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chib">             <i>chib</i><par n="chib__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="chitter">          <i>chitter</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="choose">           <i>choos</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="clear">            <i>clear</i><par n="clear__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cleck">            <i>cleck</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cless">            <i>cless</i><par n="cless__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cowp">             <i>cowp</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="creash">           <i>creash</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="decide">           <i>decid</i><par n="annoonc/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dicht">            <i>dicht</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dreep">            <i>dreep</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="emerge">    <i>emerg</i><par n="bok/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gird">             <i>gird</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="guddle">           <i>guddle</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="haundle">          <i>haund</i><par n="bauch/le__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="haunnle">   <i>haunn</i><par n="bauch/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hirple">           <i>hirpl</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="hoast">     <i>hoast</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kidnap">           <i>kidnap</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kithe">            <i>kithe</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="like">             <i>lik</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mairry">           <i>mairry</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="maiter">           <i>maiter</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="neebour">          <i>neebour</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pap">              <i>pap</i><par n="chib__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pou">              <i>pou</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pronoonce">        <i>pronoonce</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="raise">            <i>raise</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="relate">           <i>relate</i><par n="bok/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="resign">           <i>resign</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="roond">            <i>roond</i><par n="leuk__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="screive">          <i>screiv</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="screive">          <i>screiv</i><par n="annoonc/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="scrieve">          <i>scriev</i><par n="annoonc/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="serve">            <i>serv</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shaw">             <i>shaw</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="side">             <i>side</i><par n="bok/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skite">            <i>skite</i><par n="bok/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="snaw">             <i>snaw</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="spier">     <i>spier</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tap">              <i>tap</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tie">              <i>t</i><par n="chor/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tummle">           <i>tummle</i><par n="bauch/le__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wrang">            <i>wrang</i><par n="airm__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="yaise">            <i>yaise</i><par n="advis/e__vblex"/></e>
